California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(a) The department shall consider the facts submitted by an employer pursuant to Section 1327 and make a determination as to the claimant’s eligibility for benefits. The department shall promptly notify the claimant and any employer who before the determination has submitted facts or given notice pursuant to Section 1327 or this section and authorized regulations of the determination or reconsidered determination and the reasons therefor. If, after notice of a determination or reconsidered determination, the employing unit acquires knowledge of facts that may affect the eligibility of the claimant and those facts could not reasonably have been known within the 10-day period provided by Section 1327, the employing unit shall within 10 days of acquiring that knowledge submit those facts to the department, and the 10-day period
 may be extended for good cause. The claimant and the employer may appeal from a determination or reconsidered determination to an administrative law judge within 30 days from service of notice of the determination or reconsidered determination. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause, which shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 23.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1329.

(a) Upon the filing of a new claim for benefits, the department shall promptly make a computation on the claim that shall set forth the maximum amount of benefits potentially payable during the benefit year, and the weekly benefit amount. The department shall promptly notify the claimant of the computation and the method of computation. The department shall promptly notify each of the claimant’s base period employers of the computation after the payment of the first weekly benefit.

(b) The department shall promptly notify each of the claimant’s base period employers of the computation on the claim that shall set forth the number of weeks that the claimant will be eligible for benefits in the benefit year, the weekly benefit
 amount, and the maximum amount of benefits potentially payable during the benefit year, based on a determination of eligibility under Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 1266).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 678, Sec. 4.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1329.1.

A claim for unemployment compensation benefits may be canceled if all of the following apply:

(a) The individual has not been deemed ineligible for unemployment compensation benefits.

(b) The individual has not been overpaid unemployment compensation benefits.

(c) The individual has not been paid unemployment compensation benefits.

(d) The individual requests to cancel the claim during the benefit year of that claim, or in the case of a claim for federal-state extended duration benefits, during the extended duration
 period of that claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 9.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1329.5.

For purposes of a claim for unemployment benefits under subdivision (b) of Section 1275, all of the following apply:

(a) Computation using the last four completed calendar quarters shall be based on available wage information processed as of the close of business on the day preceding the date of application.

(b) If the wage information is not already in the department’s system, the department shall request the information from the employer, and the employer shall, within 10 days after the mailing of the request from the department, transmit to the department information on the employee’s wages and any other information relevant to the request. The 10-day period may be extended for good cause.

(c) If the wage, and other relevant information, requested pursuant to subdivision (b) are not received by the department, the department shall accept an affidavit of wages and other relevant information from the claimant in accordance with authorized regulations. These regulations shall be adopted as emergency regulations.

(d) A determination of benefits made pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1275 shall be adjusted when the quarterly wage report from the employer is received if that information causes a change in the determination.

(e) Except in the event of fraud, if it is determined that any information provided by the claimant on an affidavit is erroneous, no penalty or refund of benefits shall be imposed on the claimant for the period prior to the calendar week in which an employer provides subsequent wage
 information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 23, Sec. 6.   (AB 29 3x)   Effective January 25, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1330.

(a) The claimant and any base period employer to whom a notice of computation or recomputation is given may, within 30 days after the service of the notice, protest the accuracy of the computation or recomputation. The 30-day period may be extended for good cause. The department shall consider this protest and shall promptly notify the claimant and the base period employer submitting the protest of the recomputation or denial of recomputation. An appeal may be taken from a notice of denial of recomputation in the manner prescribed in Section 1328. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 24.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1331.

Any base period employer shall, within 15 days after mailing of a notice of computation, submit to the department any facts then known which he or she was not previously required to submit to the department under Section 1327 which may affect the claimant’s eligibility for benefits. The 15-day period may be extended for good cause. If after such 15-day period the employing unit acquires knowledge of facts which may affect the eligibility of the claimant and such facts could not reasonably have been known within the period, the employing unit shall, within 10 days of acquiring such knowledge, submit such facts to the department. The 10-day period may be extended for good cause. The department shall make a determination or reconsidered determination thereon and shall promptly notify the claimant and the base period employer submitting the facts of the determination or reconsidered determination and the reasons therefor. An appeal may be taken in the manner prescribed in Section 1328. The director shall be an interested party to any appeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

1332.

(a) The department shall promptly serve notice of any determination of eligibility for benefits under this part or Part 3 (commencing with Section 3501) or Part 4 (commencing with Section 4001) of this division on the claimant and on any employer or employing unit which prior to this determination has furnished the department with information regarding the claimant’s eligibility pursuant to Sections 1327 and 1331. Service may be made personally, electronically, by mail, or in any other manner the department elects. Unless a notice is
 personally served, service shall be deemed completed on the date on which the notice is sent, mailed, or emailed. If a notice is personally served, service shall be deemed completed on the date on which the notice is delivered. Failure to serve this notice shall not affect the determination of eligibility.

(1) “Notice” is that notification which apprises the party of a determination of eligibility and allows that party to respond accordingly.

(2) If the department is or should be aware that the notice was not received by the party to whom it was addressed, including, but not limited to, the return to the department of the notice by the United States Post Office, the department shall reissue the notice at such time as the department can determine a corrected mailing address for the affected party or otherwise ensure receipt. The affected party
 shall have appeal rights pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c), and pursuant to Section 1328.

(b) The department may for good cause reconsider any determination within 15 days after an appeal to an administrative law judge is filed. If no appeal is filed, the department may for good cause reconsider any determination within 30 days after service of the notice of determination. The department may, if a claimant has not filed an appeal to an administrative law judge from any determination that finds that a claimant is ineligible or disqualified, or if an appeal has been filed but is either withdrawn or dismissed, for good cause also reconsider the determination during the benefit year or extended duration period or extended benefit period to which the determination relates. The department shall give notice of any reconsidered determination to the claimant and any employer or employing unit that received notice under Sections 1328 and 1331 and the claimant or employer may appeal therefrom in the manner prescribed in Section 1328.

The director shall designate individuals to review and reconsider appealed determinations. No individual designated shall be the same individual who made the initial determination in the same
 matter.

(c) The department may for good cause reconsider any computation or recomputation provided for in this article during the benefit year or extended duration period to which the notice of computation or recomputation relates, except that no recomputation may be considered with respect to any issue considered or under consideration in an appeal taken from a denial of recomputation. The department shall promptly notify the claimant and each of the claimant’s base period employers of the recomputation. The claimant and any base period employer may protest the accuracy of the recomputation as prescribed in Section 1330.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 25.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1332.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division any provision that prescribes time limits within which the department may reconsider any determination, ruling, or computation or any provision that otherwise restricts or prevents such reconsideration, shall not apply in any case of fraud, misrepresentation or willful nondisclosure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

1333.

Notices, protests, and information required under this article shall be submitted in accordance with authorized regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1334.

(a) An administrative law judge after affording a reasonable opportunity for fair hearing, shall, unless the appeal is withdrawn, affirm, reverse, modify, or set aside any determination that is appealed under this article. The claimant, the employer becoming a party to the appeal by submitting a protest or information pursuant to Sections 1326 to 1333, inclusive, of this article, and the director shall be promptly notified in writing of the administrative law judge’s decision, together with reasons for it. The decision shall be final unless, within 30 days after mailing of the decision, further
 appeal is initiated to the appeals board pursuant to Section 1336. The 30-day limitation may be extended for good cause.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. 

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 399, Sec. 12.   (SB 1314)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1335.

If an appeal is filed, benefits with respect to the period prior to the final decision on the appeal shall be paid only after the decision, except that:

(a) If benefits for any week are payable in accordance with a determination by the department irrespective of any decision on the issues set forth in the appeal, such benefits shall be promptly paid regardless of such appeal.

(b) If an administrative law judge affirms a determination allowing benefits, such benefits shall be promptly paid regardless of any appeal which may thereafter be taken, and regardless of any action taken under Section 1336 or
 otherwise by the director, appeals board, or other administrative body or by any court.

If the determination is finally reversed, no employer’s account shall be charged with benefits paid because of that determination, except as provided in Section 1026, or if the department determines pursuant to Section 1026.1 that the employer’s reserve account should not be credited.

(c) If benefits for any week are payable in accordance with a determination by the department, or an administrative law judge issues a decision allowing benefits, the benefits shall be promptly paid regardless of any appeal, and regardless of any action taken by the appeals board pursuant to Section 412 or 413. If the determination of the department or the decision of the administrative law judge is finally reversed, no employer’s
 reserve
 account shall be charged with benefits paid pursuant to this subdivision, except as provided in Section 1026 or if the department determines pursuant to Section 1026.1 that the employer’s reserve account should not be credited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 10.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1336.

The director or any party to a decision by an administrative law judge may appeal to the appeals board from the decision. The appeals board may order the taking of additional evidence and may affirm, reverse, modify, or set aside the decision of the administrative law judge. The appeals board shall promptly notify the director and the parties to any appeal of its order or decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 537, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

1337.

The decision of the appeals board on an appeal from the decision of an administrative law judge must be rendered within 60 days after the submission of the appeal unless the board requires the taking of further evidence. If the appeals board requires the taking of further evidence, the hearing shall be commenced within 60 days after the submission of the appeal, and the decision of the board shall be mailed within 60 days after completion of the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 716, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1338.

If the appeals board issues a decision allowing benefits the benefits shall be paid regardless of any further action taken by the director, the appeals board, or any other administrative agency, and regardless of any appeal or mandamus, or other proceeding in the courts. If the decision of the appeals board is finally reversed or set aside, no employer’s account shall be charged with the benefits paid pursuant to this section, except as provided in Section 1026, or if the department determines pursuant to Section 1026.1 that the employer’s reserve account should not be credited.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 11.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1339.

(a) (1) The department shall pay unemployment compensation benefits through public employment offices or such other agency as may be prescribed by authorized regulations of the director.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2024, the department shall provide a person entitled to receive unemployment compensation benefits the option to receive payments by direct deposit, as regulated under the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act (EFTA) (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.), into a qualifying account, as defined in subdivision (a) of
 Section 1339.1, of the recipient’s choice, in addition to other alternative disbursement payment methods, including, but not limited to, debit cards and checks. 

(b) Each check or certification (pay order) issued in payment of unemployment insurance compensation benefits shall have prominently imprinted upon it: “State unemployment insurance benefits under the California Unemployment Insurance Code are paid for by employers.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 78, Sec. 11.   (AB 138)   Effective July 16, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1339.1.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding this part, if unemployment compensation benefit payments are directly deposited to an account of the recipient’s choice, as authorized under the federal Electronic Fund Transfer Act (EFTA) (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1693 et seq.), the payments may only be deposited to an account that meets the requirements of a qualifying account, as defined in paragraph (2), for deposit of public assistance payments, including unemployment compensation benefits.

(2) For purposes of this section, a “qualifying account” is one of the following:

(A) A demand deposit or savings account at an insured
 depository financial institution that is offered directly by the insured depository financial institution on its internet website or through its branches and that is in the name of the person entitled to receipt of public assistance payments.

(B) A prepaid account, or a demand deposit or savings account offered by, or through, an entity other than an insured depository financial institution, that meets all of the following:

(i) The account is held at an insured depository financial institution.

(ii) The account is set up to meet the requirements for direct or passthrough deposit or share insurance payable to the person entitled to the receipt of public assistance payments by the Federal Deposit Insurance
 Corporation in accordance with Part 330 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or the National Credit Union Share Insurance Fund in accordance with Part 745 of Title 12 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(iii) The account is not attached to a credit or overdraft feature that is automatically repaid from the account unless the credit or overdraft feature has no fee, charge, or cost, whether direct, required, voluntary, or involuntary, or the credit or overdraft feature complies with the requirements for credit offered in connection with a prepaid account under the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. Sec. 1601 et seq.) and its implementing regulations.

(iv) The account complies with all of the requirements, and provides the holder of the account with all of the consumer protections,
 that apply to an account under the rules implementing the EFTA.

(3) A person or entity that is not an insured depository financial institution that offers, maintains, or manages an account that does not comply with paragraph (2) shall not solicit, accept, or facilitate the direct deposit of unemployment compensation benefit payments to the account.

(b) The department has no obligation to determine whether an account at the insured depository financial institution of the recipient’s choice is a qualifying account, as described in subdivision (a). For purposes of this section, the department shall not be held liable for authorizing a direct deposit of unemployment compensation benefit payments into an account designated by the recipient that does not comply with paragraph (2)
 of subdivision (a).

(c) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Insured depository financial institution” means a state or national bank, a state or federal savings and loan association, a mutual savings bank, or a state or federal credit union that holds deposits insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or the National Credit Union Administration.

(2) “Prepaid account” has the same meaning as that term is defined in regulations under the EFTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 546, Sec. 2.   (SB 497)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1340.

Minors who are eligible for benefits may be paid and receive benefits in their own right, and a receipt signed by a minor shall be valid and binding.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1953, Ch. 308.)
-------------------------------------------

1341.

Benefits due a deceased or legally declared incompetent person may be paid to such person or persons as appears to the Director of Employment Development to be legally entitled thereto in accordance with authorized regulations of the Director of Employment Development. Such payment shall be made upon affidavit executed by the person or persons claiming to be entitled to the benefits and the receipt of the affidavit or affidavits shall fully discharge the Director of Employment Development from any further liability with reference to the payments, without the necessity of inquiring into the truth of any of the facts stated in the affidavit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1212, Sec. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

1342.

Any waiver by any person of any benefit or right under this code is invalid, except as provided by Sections 1255.7, 1342.1, 1345, and 2630. Benefits under this code, incentive payments provided by Division 2 (commencing with Section 5000), and payments to an individual under a plan or system established by an employer which makes provisions for his or her employees generally, or for a class or group of his or her employees, for the purpose of supplementing unemployment compensation benefits, are not subject to assignment, release, or commutation, except as provided by Sections 1255.7, 1342.1, 1345, and 2630. Any agreement by any individual in the employ of any person or concern to pay all or any portion of the contributions required of his or her employer under this division is void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1124, Sec. 5.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1342.1.

(a) An individual filing a new claim for unemployment compensation shall, at the time of filing the claim, be advised that:

(1) Unemployment compensation and disability insurance benefits, when paid in lieu of unemployment compensation, are subject to federal income tax.

(2) Requirements exist pertaining to estimated tax payments.

(3) The individual may elect to have federal income tax deducted and withheld from the compensation at the amount specified in the Internal Revenue Code.

(4) The individual is permitted to change a previously elected withholding status.

(b) Amounts deducted and withheld from unemployment and disability compensation shall be made in accordance with procedures specified by the United States Department of Labor and Internal Revenue Service pertaining to the deducting and withholding of income tax, and in accordance with the priorities established in department regulations developed by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1124, Sec. 6.   Effective September 30, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1345.

(a) An individual covered by a voluntary plan approved under Section 3254 may, at the time he or she applies for voluntary plan benefits or at any time while receiving voluntary plan benefits, voluntarily choose to allow his or her employer or an agent of the employer, appointed under Section 1096, to redirect a portion of the voluntary plan benefits payable under this code to cover all or part of the cost of employee-paid benefits, if both the following requirements are satisfied:

(1) The individual has given written authorization for the redirection of a weekly dollar amount of voluntary plan benefits for the payment of the employee-paid benefits.

(2) The individual may terminate or change the terms of the voluntary redirection of benefits paid at any time while receiving benefits under the voluntary plan.

(b) Any request to redirect benefits as provided in subdivision (a) shall be in writing. The form of employee authorization required under this section shall be approved by the director.

(c) In no event shall disability benefits payments be delayed because an individual elects to redirect a portion of his or her benefits payable under this division.

(d) Should an individual be legally declared incompetent, the spouse of the individual, in the absence of any other legally authorized representative, shall have the right to continue or cancel the authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 960, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Overpayments [1375. - 1384.]

1375.

Any person who is overpaid any amount of benefits under this part is liable for the amount overpaid unless any of the following is applicable:

(a) (1) The overpayment was not due to fraud, misrepresentation or willful nondisclosure on the part of the recipient, and (2) the overpayment was received without fault on the part of the recipient, and its recovery would be against equity and good conscience.

(b) The person who received the overpayment cooperates with the department in an investigation that results in the assessment of a penalty under Section 1144 or the prosecution or other action taken to impose a penalty pursuant to Section 2121.

(c) The department determines that it is in the interest of justice to waive all or part of the liability established under this section because the overpayment was a direct result of inducement, solicitation, or coercion on the part of the employer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1050, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.1.

If the director finds that an individual has been overpaid unemployment compensation benefits because he or she willfully, for the purpose of obtaining unemployment compensation benefits, either made a false statement or representation, with actual knowledge of the falsity thereof, or withheld a material fact, the director shall assess against the individual an amount equal to 30 percent of the overpayment amount. Assessments collected under this section shall be deposited in the following manner:

(a) For penalty assessments established prior to October 22, 2013, 100 percent of the overpayment penalty amount in the Benefit Audit Fund.

(b) For penalty assessments established on or after October 22, 2013, as follows:

(1) 50 percent of the overpayment penalty amount in the Unemployment Trust Fund.

(2) 50 percent of the overpayment penalty amount in the Benefit Audit Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 12.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.3.

No determination of overpayment shall be based upon the disallowance by the Workmen’s Compensation Appeals Board of a claim of lien filed under subdivision (g) of Section 4903 of the Labor Code, or the allowance of such lien for less than the amount claimed as a lien, or upon the approval by the said appeals board of a compromise and release agreement providing for the allowance of such lien in an amount less than the amount claimed as a lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1721.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.5.

Any claim of lien filed with the Workmen’s Compensation Appeals Board under the provisions of Section 4903 of the Labor Code shall be fully discharged and satisfied by payment of the amount of such lien allowed by the said appeals board under the provisions of Section 4904 of said code or the amount specified in any compromise and release agreement filed and approved by the said appeals board pursuant to Sections 5000 through 5004 of said code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1721.)
-------------------------------------------

1375.7.

The director shall find that an individual has been overpaid unemployment benefits where the individual was an elected official and the individual’s unemployment insurance claim was based on income solely derived from his or her employment as an elected official. An individual who is liable pursuant to this section shall not be eligible for waiver of the overpayment pursuant to Section 1375. In the event of an unemployment insurance claim based on more than one source of income, if the base period of a new claim includes any wage credits earned as an elected official pursuant to Section 634.5, the individual shall be liable for any amount of unemployment insurance benefits overpaid as a result of a recomputation to remove the base period wage credits earned as an elected official. In that
 event, the provisions of Section 1375 shall not apply to this section with respect to the wage credits earned as an elected official.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 222, Sec. 1.   (SB 1211)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

1376.

The Director of Employment Development shall determine the amount of the overpayment and any assessment authorized under Section 1375.1 and shall notify the liable person of the basis of the overpayment determination. In the absence of fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure, notice of the overpayment determination shall be served within the latest of the following periods:

(a) Not later than one year after the close of the benefit year in which the overpayment was made.

(b) Not later than six months after the date a backpay award was made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 26.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1377.

(a) Within 30 days from the date of mailing or serving of the notice of overpayment, the person affected may file an appeal to an administrative law judge. The director shall be an interested party to any such appeal. The administrative law judge, after affording reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing, shall, unless the appeal is withdrawn, affirm, reverse, modify, or set aside the findings set forth in the
 notice of overpayment. The party and the director shall be notified of the administrative law judge’s decision, together with his or her reasons therefor, which shall be final unless within 30 days from the date of notification or mailing of the decision a further appeal is initiated to the appeals board pursuant to Section 1336. The 30-day period for an appeal to the administrative law judge or to the appeals board may be extended for good cause.

(b) “Good cause,” as used in this section, shall include, but not be limited to, mistake, inadvertence, surprise, or excusable neglect. 

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 399, Sec. 14.   (SB 1314)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative July 1, 2015, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1378.

The Appeals Board shall review an appeal from an overpayment determination as provided in Sections 1336 and 1337 and determine what amount, if any, shall be recovered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 266.)
-------------------------------------------

1379.

The director, subject to this article, may do any or all of the following in the recovery of overpayments of unemployment compensation benefits:

(a) File a civil action against the liable person for the recovery of the amount of the overpayment within one year after any of the following, or, in cases where the individual has been overpaid benefits due to fraud, misrepresentation, or nondisclosure as described in Section 1375.1, or where the director has found an overpayment pursuant to Section 1375.7, within three years of any of the following:

(1) The service of the notice of overpayment determination if the person affected does not file an appeal to an administrative law judge.

(2) The mailing of the decision of the administrative law judge if the person affected does not initiate a further appeal to the appeals board.

(3) The date of the decision of the appeals board.

(b) Initiate proceedings for a summary judgment against the liable person. However, this subdivision applies only where the director has found, pursuant to Section 1375, that the overpayment may not be waived because it was due to fraud, misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure on the part of the recipient or where the director has found an overpayment pursuant to Section 1375.7. The director may, not later than three
 years after the overpayment became final, file with the clerk of the proper court in the county from which the overpayment of benefits was paid or in the county in which the claimant resides, a certificate containing all of the following:

(1) The amount due, including any assessment made under Section 1375.1, plus interest from the date that the initial determination of overpayment was made pursuant to Section 1376.

(2) A statement that the director has complied with all the provisions of this article prior to the filing of the certificate.

(3) A request that judgment be entered against the liable person in the amount set forth in the certificate.

The clerk, immediately upon the filing of the certificate, shall enter a judgment for the State of California against the liable
 person in the amount set forth in the certificate.

For the purposes of this subdivision only, an overpayment is final and due and payable after any of the following:

(A) The liable person has not filed an appeal pursuant to Section 1377.

(B) The liable person has filed an appeal to the administrative law judge and a decision of an administrative law judge has become final.

(C) The liable person has filed an appeal to the appeals board and the decision of the appeals board has become final because the liable person has not sought judicial review within the six-month period provided by Section 410.

(c) Reduce or vacate a summary judgment by filing a certificate to that effect with the clerk of the proper
 court.

(d) Offset the amount of the overpayment received by the liable person against any amount of benefits to which they may become entitled under this division within six years of the date of the service of the notice of overpayment determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 67, Sec. 27.   (SB 191)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1379.5.

An abstract of judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1379, or a copy thereof, may be recorded with the county recorder of any county. From the time of recording, the judgment shall constitute a lien against all real or personal property of the liable person in that county owned by the liable person at the time, or which the liable person may afterwards, but before the lien expires, acquire. The lien shall have the force, effect, and priority of a judgment lien and shall continue for 10 years from the time of recording of the abstract of judgment obtained pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1379, unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

The lien may, within 10 years from the date of recording of the abstract of judgment or within 10 years from the date of the last extension of the lien in the manner provided in this section, be extended by recording a new abstract in the office of the county recorder of any county. From the date of such recording, the lien shall be extended for 10 years unless sooner released or otherwise discharged.

Execution shall issue upon such a judgment upon request of the director in the same manner as execution may issue upon other judgments. Sales shall be held under such execution as prescribed in the Code of Civil Procedure. In all proceedings under this section, the director or his or her authorized agents may act on behalf of the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1236, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1379.6.

(a) If an abstract has been recorded as provided in Section 1379.5, and the lien, including any interest, costs, and penalty, has been satisfied in full, the department shall, pursuant to Section 724.050 of the Code of Civil Procedure do all of the following:

(1) File an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment with the court.

(2) Serve an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment on the claimant. Service shall be made personally or by mail.

(3) Record an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment in the office of the county recorder where the abstract of judgment is recorded.

(b) If an acknowledgment of satisfaction of judgment is recorded, the cost of recording is an obligation of the claimant and may be collected from the claimant in any manner provided by law for the collection of benefit overpayments.

(c) If payment is made by check, any action specified in subdivision (a) shall not be required until the check has been paid by the financial institution upon which it was drawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1010, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

1380.

No person shall be liable for the amount of benefits received where the benefits were paid pursuant to an administrative law judge’s decision which affirmed an initial determination or in accordance with a final decision of the appeals board, regardless of any further appeal. An employer’s experience rating account shall not be charged with any benefits erroneously or unlawfully paid, except as provided in Section 1026 or 1144.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1050, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1381.

The director shall enforce collection of any judgment obtained by the director under subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1379. Amounts collected under this section shall be deposited in the fund from which the overpayment was made, except that the amounts collected to offset the costs of collections shall be deposited in the Unemployment Administration Fund and the amounts collected pursuant to Section 1375.1 shall be deposited as specified in that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 783, Sec. 13.   (AB 1845)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1382.

No person shall be liable for the amount of benefits received for any period for which the person also received an award or settlement of backpay resulting from an action or grievance for wrongful discharge, if the amount of the backpay award or settlement was reduced by the amount of benefits received pursuant to this part. When the amount of the backpay award or settlement was reduced by the amount of benefits received, the employer shall pay to the Unemployment Fund an amount equal to the amount subtracted from the backpay award or settlement for benefits received by the person in order to reimburse the fund. When an individual has been awarded or receives backpay, the amount of the backpay shall constitute wages paid in the period for which it is awarded.

A mediator or arbitrator who is a party to the backpay award or settlement shall, within 30 days of the settlement, report to the department the name and address of the employer, the amount of benefits by which the award or settlement was reduced, and the name and social security number of the person who received the award or settlement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1035, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1383.
